Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20142-2646.01
Pesticide business; owner or operator;
liability.

Any person who owns or operates a business that
uses pesticides on the property of another person for hire or compensation
shall be responsible for the acts or omissions of anyone using a pesticide
for such business. Such person shall be subject to the same fines, license actions, and other enforcement actions prescribed
by the Pesticide Act for violations under the act as the applicator.

Laws 2002, LB 436, § 12;

Laws 2013, LB69, § 12.